Illinois, session 104th, SB431.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Diversifying Higher Education Faculty in 5Illinois Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 930/1)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2301)7    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Diversifying Higher Education Faculty in Illinois Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-862, eff. 8-4-04.)